Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.169

Employee performance evaluations—Standardized procedures and forms required to be developed.

After consultation with state agency heads, employee organizations, and other interested parties, the director shall develop standardized employee performance evaluation procedures and forms which shall be used by state agencies for the appraisal of employee job performance at least annually. These procedures shall include means whereby individual agencies may supplement the standardized evaluation process with special performance factors peculiar to specific organizational needs. Performance evaluation procedures shall place primary emphasis on recording how well the employee has contributed to efficiency, effectiveness, and economy in fulfilling state agency and job objectives.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 414; 1985 c 461 s 3; 1982 1st ex.s. c 53 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—1985 c 461: See note following RCW 41.06.020.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 53: See note following RCW 41.06.020.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 152: See note following RCW 41.06.150.